Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Information Technology
42.740.
Geographic Information Advisory Council — Purpose — Members — Conflicts of interest.

There is hereby established a Geographic Information Advisory Council, attached to the Commonwealth Office of Technology for administrative purposes, to advise the executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology on issues relating to geographic information and geographic information systems.

The council shall recommend policies and procedures that assist state and local jurisdictions in developing, deploying, and leveraging geographic information resources and geographic information systems technology for the purpose of improving public administration.

The council shall closely coordinate with users of geographic information systems to recommend policies and procedures that ensure the maximum use of geographic information by minimizing the redundancy of geographic information and geographic information resources, as well as to ensure that the geographic information clearinghouse maintained by the Division of Geographic Information Systems meets the needs of all state agencies.

The Geographic Information Advisory Council shall consist of twenty-five (25) members and one (1) legislative liaison. The members shall be knowledgeable in the use and application of geographic information systems technology and shall have sufficient authority within their organizations to influence the implementation of council recommendations.

The council shall consist of:

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet or his or her designee;

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her designee;

The director of the Kentucky Geological Survey or his or her designee;

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology or her or his designee, who shall serve as chair;

The secretary of the Economic Development Cabinet or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or her designee;

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or his or her designee;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the president of the Council on Postsecondary Education;

The adjutant general of the Department of Military Affairs or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Education or his or her designee;

The secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet or his or her designee;

The Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture or his or her designee;

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Office of Property Valuation or his or her designee;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of six (6) persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky League of Cities;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of six (6) persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Association of Counties;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Chapter of the American Planning Association;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Association of Professional Surveyors;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the chairman of the Kentucky Board of Registered Geologists;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the president of the Council of Area Development Districts;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the president of the Kentucky Association of Mapping Professionals;

One (1) member appointed by the Governor from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the executive director of the Kentucky Property Valuation Administrators Association; and

The executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security.

The council shall have one (1) nonvoting legislative liaison, to be appointed by the Legislative Research Commission.

The council may have committees and subcommittees as determined by the council or an executive committee, if an executive committee exists.

A member of the council shall not:

Be an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a business entity that has, or of a trade association for business entities that have, a substantial interest in the geographic information industry and is doing business in the Commonwealth;

Own, control, or have, directly or indirectly, more than ten percent (10%) interest in a business entity that has a substantial interest in the geographic information industry;

Be in any manner connected with any contract or bid for furnishing any governmental body of the Commonwealth with geographic information systems, the computers on which they are automated, or a service related to geographic information systems;

Be a person required to register as a lobbyist because of activities for compensation on behalf of a business entity that has, or on behalf of a trade association of business entities that have, substantial interest in the geographic information industry;

Accept or receive money or another thing of value from an individual, firm, or corporation to whom a contract may be awarded, directly or indirectly, by rebate, gift, or otherwise; or

Be liable to civil action or any action performed in good faith in the performance of duties as a council member.

Those council members specified in subsection (4)(a) of this section who serve by virtue of an office shall serve on the board while they hold that office.

Appointed members of the council shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Vacancies in the membership of the council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. If a nominating organization changes its name, its successor organization having the same responsibilities and purposes shall be the nominating organization.

The council shall have no funds of its own, and council members shall not receive compensation of any kind from the council.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Members’ designees shall have voting privileges at council meetings.

History.

Enacts. Acts 1994, ch. 327, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1997 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 40, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 48, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 69, § 23, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 87, effective July 15, 1998; repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 33 effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 5, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 123, § 6, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 85, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 9, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, §
35, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 117, § 31, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 69, § 10, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 139, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 229, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

42.742.
Duties of Geographic Information Advisory Council.

The Geographic Information Advisory Council’s duties shall include the following:

Recommending the development and adoption of policies and procedures related to geographic information and geographic information systems;

Providing input and recommendations for the development of a strategy for the maintenance and funding of a statewide base map and geographic information system;

Recommending standards on geographic information and geographic information systems for inclusion in the statewide architecture;

Contributing to the development and delivery of a statewide geographic information plan;

Recommending policies and procedures that ensure that the geographic information clearinghouse maintained by the Division of Geographic Information Systems meets the needs of all state agencies;

Overseeing the development of operating policies and procedures for the management of the council and any standing or ad hoc committees and associated advisory groups; and

Promoting collaboration and the sharing of data and data development, as well as other aspects of geographic information systems.

The Division of Geographic Information Systems shall provide necessary staff support services to the council. All cabinets, departments, divisions, agencies, and officers of the Commonwealth shall furnish the council necessary assistance, resources, information, records, or advice as it may require to fulfill its duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 327, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 2000, ch. 506, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 536, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 36, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 13, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 69, § 11, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 78, § 6, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 81, § 6, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 229, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

42.744.
Addition of nonlicensed raster-based datasets of publicly funded Kentucky locations to the Geospatial Data Warehouse — Exceptions — Confidentiality.

All entities in Kentucky that create or purchase digital ortho-rectified aerial imagery, remotely sensed imagery, LiDAR, digital elevation models, or any other form of nonlicensed raster-based datasets of locations in Kentucky using public funds, in whole or in part, shall provide a copy of the information to the Commonwealth Office of Technology, Division of Geographic Information Systems, without cost, in order to allow the Commonwealth Office of Technology to effectively discharge its statutory responsibility to maintain an accurate and complete central statewide geographic information clearinghouse for official state use. The imagery provided to the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall be added to Kentucky’s secure Geospatial Data Warehouse for official government use only.

All entities in Kentucky that create or purchase digital ortho-rectified aerial imagery, remotely sensed imagery, LiDAR, digital elevation models, or any other form of raster-based datasets of locations in Kentucky using public funds, in whole or in part, shall create or purchase that information in a nonlicensed format whenever such a format is available.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to roads, land parcels, structure locations, or other vector-based datasets acquired with public funding.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall not disclose to the general public or make available for distribution, download, or purchase any data that an entity providing data under subsection (1) of this section has requested remain confidential.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 14, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 69, § 12, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 78, § 7, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 81, § 7, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 229, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

42.746.
Statewide planning and mapping system for public buildings.

To the extent funds are made available, the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall establish a statewide planning and mapping system for public buildings in this state for use by response agencies who are called to respond to an act of terrorism or an emergency.

The statewide planning and mapping system for public buildings shall include:

Floor plans, fire protection information, building evacuation plans, utility information, known hazards, and information on how to contact emergency personnel;

The manner by which the information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be transferred to the system from state agencies and the local political subdivisions who participate in the system;

Standards for the software that shall be used by state agencies and local political subdivisions that participate in the system;

Conditions for use of the system by response agencies;

Guidelines for:

The accessibility and confidentiality of information contained within the system; and

The incorporation, in connection with the use of the system, of the items described in subsection (3)(b) of this section;

In accordance with information obtained by the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security, a priority for the distribution of any money that may be available for state agencies and political subdivisions to participate in the system; and

Guidelines recommended by the Division of Emergency Management for the training of persons employed by the response agencies concerning the use of the system.

To the extent money is available, state agencies and political subdivisions shall:

Participate in the statewide planning and mapping system; and

Incorporate into their use of the system, without limitation:

Evacuation routes and strategies for evacuation;

Alarms and other signals or means of notification;

Plans for remaining inside a building, room, structure, or other location during an emergency when egress may be impossible or when egress may present a more substantial risk than remaining inside; and

Training and strategies for prevention in connection with attacks involving violence.

If a state agency or political subdivision uses its own planning and mapping system before the Commonwealth Office of Technology establishes a statewide planning and mapping system, the state agency or political subdivision may continue to use its system unless money is made available for the state agency or political subdivision to update or modify its system as necessary for inclusion in the statewide system.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology:

Shall pursue any money that may be available from the federal government for the development and operation of a statewide planning and mapping system for public buildings, and for the distribution of grants to state agencies and political subdivisions that participate in the system; and

May accept gifts, grants, and contributions for the development and operation of a statewide planning and mapping system, and for the distribution of grants to the state agencies and political subdivisions that participate in the system.

Each state agency and political subdivision that participates in the system shall, on or before July 1, 2007, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, submit to the Commonwealth Office of Technology a progress report setting forth, in accordance with regulations promulgated by the Commonwealth Office of Technology, the experience of the agency or political subdivision with respect to its participation in the system. The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall receive and process the progress reports, and provide a summarized overview of the system to the Legislative Research Commission on or before October 1, 2007, and on or before October 1 of each year thereafter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 223, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 15, effective June 25, 2009.

42.747.
Blockchain Technology Working Group.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Blockchain technology” means shared or distributed data structures or digital ledgers used in peer-to-peer networks that:

Store digital transactions;

Verify and secure transactions cryptographically; and

Allow automated self-execution of smart contracts;

“Peer-to-peer networks” means computer systems that are connected to each other over the Internet so that each computer system:

Is a client and a server simultaneously; and

Allows file sharing without use of a central server;

“Smart contract” means a computerized transaction protocol that self- executes the terms of a contract and that is integrated into the blockchain program architecture; and

“Contract” means an agreement of the parties in fact, as found in their language or inferred from other circumstances, including course of performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade, reached through offer and mutual acceptance by the parties to be legally bound by the terms of the agreement which includes valuable consideration for all parties.

There is hereby established a Blockchain Technology Working Group which shall be attached to the Commonwealth Office of Technology for administrative purposes.

The working group shall evaluate the feasibility and efficacy of using blockchain technology to enhance the security of and increase protection for the state’s critical infrastructure, including but not limited to the electric utility grid, natural gas pipelines, drinking water supply and delivery, wastewater, telecommunications, and emergency services. The workgroup shall create a priority list of critical infrastructure that could benefit from the use of blockchain technology and then determine whether:

Blockchain fits the distributed nature of transactions;

The peer-to-peer network is robust enough to support the use of blockchain technology;

A cost-benefit analysis of blockchain for each case is warranted to demonstrate its value, applicability, or efficiency; and

If the parties involved in the blockchain would agree to its usage if deployed.

The workgroup shall consist of nine (9) members, three (3) of which shall be ex officio, as follows:

The chief information officer for the Commonwealth Office of Technology or his or her designee who shall serve as chair;

The secretary for the Energy and Environment Cabinet or his or her designee;

The chief information officer for the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee;

A representative designated by the executive director of the Kentucky Public Service Commission, who has knowledge of the spatial characteristics of the infrastructure used by public utilities;

The executive director of Kentucky Department of Homeland Security or his or her designee;

One (1) member in academia designated by the chief information officer of the Commonwealth Office of Technology, who has expertise in blockchain technology and its applicability to different industry sectors

One (1) ex officio member representing the Kentucky Municipal Utilities Association (KMUA) designated by the executive director of KMUA;

One (1) ex officio member representing the investor-owned electric utilities designated by the executive director of the Kentucky Public Service Commission; and

One (1) ex officio member representing Kentucky electric cooperatives designated by the chairman of the board of the Kentucky Association of Electric Cooperatives.

The workgroup shall be staffed by the Commonwealth Office of Technology.

The workgroup shall report to the Governor and to the Legislative Research Commission by December 1 of each year. The report shall include the current priority list and a discussion of whether blockchain could be deployed, and any associated cost-benefit analysis.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

42.800.
Kentucky Kare Health Insurance Authority — Board of directors — Executive director — Annual audit. [Repealed.]

42.805.
Kentucky Kare health insurance fund — Benefits — Contributions — Provisions of plan — Group rates for disabled children. [Repealed.]

42.810.
Duties of authority — Amounts credited to fund — Investment of fund — Annual report — Actuarial evaluation. [Repealed.]

42.815.
Self-funded health insurance fund not subject to certain taxes. [Repealed.]

42.820.
Authority determines date on which option is available. [Repealed.]

42.825.
Exclusion of coverage for employment-related conditions. [Repealed.]

42.990.
Penalties. [Repealed and reenacted.]